src/sma-lex.txt
LEXICON GUARKEDH_TV
 +V+TV:  GUARKEDH ;
 +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL:a%»sovv SOVVEDH ;
 +V+TV+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML VÅÅJNEDH ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/htalle:%»ahtall SOVVEDH ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/lgidh:%»alg LGIDH ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs

LEXICON GUARKEDH_IV
 +V+IV:  GUARKEDH ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassL:a%»sovv IV_PASSIVE_L ;
 +V+IV+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML IV_PASSIVE_S ;


LEXICON GUARKEDH ! row B - Group III
 +Ind+Prs:%>    V-III-PRS-SG ; ! class III special
 +Ind+Prs:%>a   VSUF-EVEN-PRS-DUPL ;
 +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>oeh FINAL1 ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>aj  VSUF-PRT ;
 +Imprt:%>        VSUF-III-EVEN-IMP ;
 +Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>aj FINAL1 ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
 +Inf:%>edh     FINAL1 ;
 +VGen:%>an     FINAL1 ;
! +Act:%>eme     FINAL1 ;
 +Ger:%>aminie  FINAL1 ;
 +PrsPrc:%>ije  FINAL1 ;
! +PrsPrc:%>ijes  FINAL1 ;
 +PrfPrc:%>eme  FINAL1 ;
 +ConNeg:%>ah   FINAL1 ;
! Derivations
! -----------
 +Der3+Der/NomAg:%»ij@C.NeedNoun@     N_ODD ;
 +Der3+Der/NomAct:%»am@C.NeedNoun@    NomActOdd ;
 +Der1+Der/les:%»%^didhUMLel LES ;
 +Der3+Der/gåete+V:%»agået GÅETEDH ;
 +Der1+Der/stidh+V:%»ast DÅAJVOEHTIDH ;
 +Der1+Der/lidh+V:%»al GOLTELIDH ;
 +Der1+Der/htidh:%»aht DÅAJVOEHTIDH_TV ;
! +Der1+Der/dehte:%»adeht ÅARAJEHTEDH_TV ; !we have -didh + -ehtedh
 +Der3+Der/ahtje+V:%»ajahtj AHTJE ;
 +Der1+Der/didh+V:%»%^didhUMLed GOLTELIDH ;
! +Der1+Der/ldihkie:%»aldihkie ø_Ø_EVEN ; !not to a-verbs
! +Der1+Der/ldahke:%»aldahk LDAHKE ; !not to a-verbs
! +Der1+Der/ldh+N+SgNomCmp:%»eldh R ; !not to a-verbs
! +Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom:%»eldh FINAL1 ; !not to a-verbs


LEXICON SIJHTEDH_TV
 +V+TV: TJOEHPEDH_NOTVGEN ;
 +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL:e%»sovv SOVVEDH ;
 +V+TV+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML VÅÅJNEDH ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/htalle:%»ehtall SOVVEDH ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/lgidh:%»elg LGIDH ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs



LEXICON TJOEHPEDH_TV
 +V+TV: TJOEHPEDH ;
 +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL:e%»sovv SOVVEDH ;
 +V+TV+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML VÅÅJNEDH ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/htalle:%»ehtall SOVVEDH ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/lgidh:%»elg LGIDH ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs

LEXICON GALKEDH_IV
 +V+IV: GALKEDH_CONT ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassL:e%»sovv IV_PASSIVE_L ;
! +V+IV+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML IV_PASSIVE_S ;



LEXICON TJOEHPEDH_IV
 +V+IV: TJOEHPEDH ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassL:e%»sovv IV_PASSIVE_L ;
 +V+IV+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML IV_PASSIVE_S ;


LEXICON TJOEHPEDH ! row D - Group IV
 +VGen:%>en      FINAL1 ;
 +VGen+Use/Sub:ien      FINAL1 ;
TJOEHPEDH_NOTVGEN ;


LEXICON TJOEHPEDH_NOTVGEN
 +Ind+Prs:%>     V-IV-EVEN-PRS ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>     VSUF-PRT-SG-12 ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>     VSUF-PRT-DUPL ;
 +Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i  FINAL1  ;
 +Imprt:%>         VSUF-IV-EVEN-IMP ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
 +Inf:%>edh      FINAL1 ;
! +Act:%>eme      FINAL1 ;
 +Ger:%>eminie   FINAL1 ;
 +PrsPrc:%>ije   FINAL1 ;
! +PrsPrc:%>ijes  FINAL1 ;
 +PrfPrc+NoUml:%>eme   FINAL1 ;          ! tjoehpeme, bïejeme
 +PrfPrc+Uml:%>%^1UMLeme  FINAL1 ; ! tjuahpeme, beajeme
 +ConNeg:%>0h    FINAL1 ;
! Derivations
! -----------
 +Der3+Der/NomAg:%»ij@C.NeedNoun@     N_ODD ;
 +Der3+Der/NomAct:%»em@C.NeedNoun@    NomActOdd ;
 +Der1+Der/les:e%»l LES ;
 +Der3+Der/gåete+V:%»egået GÅETEDH ;
 +Der1+Der/stidh+V:%»est DÅAJVOEHTIDH ;
 +Der1+Der/lidh+V:%»el GOLTELIDH ;
 +Der1+Der/htidh:%»eht DÅAJVOEHTIDH_TV ;
! +Der1+Der/dehte:%»edeht ÅARAJEHTEDH_TV ; !we have -didh + -ehtedh
 +Der3+Der/ahtje+V:%»ijahtj AHTJE ;
 +Der1+Der/didh+V:%»ed GOLTELIDH ;
 +Der1+Der/ldihkie:%»eldihkie ø_Ø_EVEN ;
 +Der1+Der/ldahke:%»eldahk LDAHKE ;
 +Der1+Der/ldh+N+SgNomCmp:%»eldh R ;
 +Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom:%»eldh FINAL1 ;
 +Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:%»eld FINAL1 ; !


LEXICON GALKEDH_CONT ! row D - Group IV
 +Ind+Prs:%>     V-IV-EVEN-PRS ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>     VSUF-PRT-SG-12 ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>     VSUF-PRT-DUPL ;
 +Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i  FINAL1  ;
! +Imprt:%>         VSUF-IV-EVEN-IMP ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
 +Inf:%>edh      FINAL1 ;
! +Act:%>eme      FINAL1 ;
 +Ger:%>eminie   FINAL1 ;
! +PrsPrc:%>ije   FINAL1 ;
! +PrsPrc:%>ijes  FINAL1 ;
 +PrfPrc+NoUml:%>eme   FINAL1 ;          ! tjoehpeme, bïejeme
 +PrfPrc+Uml:%>%^1UMLeme  FINAL1 ; ! tjuahpeme, beajeme
 +ConNeg:%>0h    FINAL1 ;
! Derivations
! -----------
! +Der3+Der/NomAg:%»ij@C.NeedNoun@     N_ODD ;
 +Der3+Der/NomAct:%»em@C.NeedNoun@    NomActOdd ;
! +Der1+Der/les:e%»l LES ;
! +Der3+Der/gåete+V:%»egået GÅETEDH ;
! +Der1+Der/stidh+V:%»est DÅAJVOEHTIDH ;
! +Der1+Der/lidh+V:%»el GOLTELIDH ;
! +Der1+Der/htidh:%»eht DÅAJVOEHTIDH_TV ;
!! +Der1+Der/dehte:%»edeht ÅARAJEHTEDH_TV ; !we have -didh + -ehtedh
! +Der3+Der/ahtje+V:%»ijahtj AHTJE ;
! +Der1+Der/didh+V:%»ed GOLTELIDH ;
! +Der1+Der/ldihkie:%»eldihkie ø_Ø_EVEN ;
! +Der1+Der/ldahke:%»eldahk LDAHKE ;
! +Der1+Der/ldh+N+SgNomCmp:%»eldh R ;
! +Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom:%»eldh FINAL1 ;
! +Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:%»eld FINAL1 ; !
 



LEXICON BIEGKEDH ! row D - Group IV !impersonals
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%>%^3sUMLa     FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i  FINAL1  ;
! +V+IV+Imprt:%>         VSUF-IV-EVEN-IMP ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
 +V+IV+Inf:%>edh      FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+VGen:%>en      FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Act:%>eme      FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Ger:%>eminie   FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+PrfPrc+Uml:%>%^1UMLeme  FINAL1 ; !
 +V+IV+ConNeg:%>0h    FINAL1 ;
! Derivations
! -----------
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAg:%»ij@C.NeedNoun@     N_ODD ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAct:%»em@C.NeedNoun@    NomActOdd ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/les:e%»l LES ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassL:e%»sovv IV_PASSIVE_L ;
 +V+IV+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML IV_PASSIVE_S ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/gåete+V+Ind+Prs+Uml+Sg3:%»egået%>%^1UMLa FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/gåete+V+Ind+Prt+Uml+Sg3:%»egået%>%^iUMLi FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/gåete+V+Ind+Prt+Uml+Sg3+Use/Sub:%»egået%>%^iUML%^DISIMPi FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/gåete+V+Inf:%»egået%>edh           FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/gåete+V+ConNeg:%»egået%>ieh        FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/gåete+V+VGen:%»egået%>ien          FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/gåete+V+Act:%»egået%>eme           FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/gåete+V+Ger:%»egået%>ieminie       FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/gåete+V+PrfPrc+Uml:%»egået%>%^1UMLeme  FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%»est%>%^DISIMPe FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»est%>i FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Use/Sub:%»est%>%^DISIMPi FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Inf:%»est%>idh             FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+ConNeg:%»est%>%^DISIMPh    FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+VGen:%»est%>%^DISIMPen     FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Act:%»est%>immie           FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Ger:%»est%>%^DISIMPeminie  FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+PrfPrc:%»est%>amme         FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Der2+Der/alle+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%»est%»%^adteUMLall%>%^3sUMLa   FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Der2+Der/alle+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»est%»%^adteUMLall%>i  FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Der2+Der/alle+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Use/Sub:%»est%»%^adteUMLall%>%^DISIMPi  FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Der2+Der/alle+V+Inf:%»est%»%^adteUMLall%>edh      FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Der2+Der/alle+V+VGen:%»est%»%^adteUMLall%>en      FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Der2+Der/alle+V+Act:%»est%»%^adteUMLall%>eme      FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Der2+Der/alle+V+Ger:%»est%»%^adteUMLall%>eminie   FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Der2+Der/alle+V+PrfPrc:%»est%»%^adteUMLall%>eme   FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Der2+Der/alle+V+ConNeg:%»est%»%^adteUMLall%>0h    FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%»el%>%^DISIMPe FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»el%>i  FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Use/Sub:%»el%>%^DISIMPi  FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Inf:%»el%>idh             FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+ConNeg:%»el%>%^DISIMPh    FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+VGen:%»el%>%^DISIMPen     FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Act:%»el%>immie           FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Ger:%»el%>%^DISIMPeminie  FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+PrfPrc:%»el%>amme         FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%»el%»%^adteUMLadt%>%^3sUMLa   FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»el%»%^adteUMLadt%>i  FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Use/Sub:%»el%»%^adteUMLadt%>%^DISIMPi  FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Inf:%»el%»%^adteUMLadt%>edh      FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+VGen:%»el%»%^adteUMLadt%>en      FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Act:%»el%»%^adteUMLadt%>eme      FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ger:%»el%»%^adteUMLadt%>eminie   FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+PrfPrc:%»el%»%^adteUMLadt%>eme   FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+ConNeg:%»el%»%^adteUMLadt%>0h    FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%»ijahtj%>%^3sUMLa   FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»ijahtj%>i  FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Use/Sub:%»ijahtj%>%^DISIMPi  FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Inf:%»ijahtj%>edh      FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+VGen:%»ijahtj%>en      FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Act:%»ijahtj%>eme      FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ger:%»ijahtj%>eminie   FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+PrfPrc:%»ijahtj%>eme   FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+ConNeg:%»ijahtj%>0h    FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/didh+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%»ed%>%^DISIMPe FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/didh+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»ed%>i  FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/didh+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Use/Sub:%»ed%>%^DISIMPi  FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/didh+V+Inf:%»ed%>idh             FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/didh+V+ConNeg:%»ed%>%^DISIMPh    FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/didh+V+VGen:%»ed%>%^DISIMPen     FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/didh+V+Act:%»ed%>immie           FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/didh+V+Ger:%»ed%>%^DISIMPeminie  FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/didh+V+PrfPrc:%»ed%>amme         FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/didh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>%^3sUMLa   FINAL1  ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/didh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>i FINAL1  ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/didh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Use/Sub:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>%^DISIMPi  FINAL1  ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/didh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Inf:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>edh      FINAL1  ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/didh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+VGen:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>en      FINAL1  ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/didh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Act:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>eme      FINAL1  ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/didh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ger:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>eminie   FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/didh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+PrfPrc:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>eme   FINAL1  ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/didh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+ConNeg:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>0h    FINAL1  ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/htalle:%»ehtall SOVVEDH ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/lgidh:%»elg LGIDH ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldihkie:%»eldihkie ø_Ø_EVEN ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldahke:%»eldahk LDAHKE ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+SgNomCmp:%»eldh R ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom:%»eldh FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:%»eld FINAL1 ; !

LEXICON BÅÅHKEDH_TV
 +V+TV: BÅÅHKEDH ;
 +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL:e%»sovv SOVVEDH ;
 +V+TV+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML VÅÅJNEDH ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/htalle:%»ehtall SOVVEDH ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/lgidh:%»elg LGIDH ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs

LEXICON SÅÅJHTEDH_IV
 +V+IV: SÅÅJHTEDH_CONT ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassL:e%»sovv IV_PASSIVE_L ;
! +V+IV+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML IV_PASSIVE_S ;



LEXICON BÅÅHKEDH_IV
 +V+IV: BÅÅHKEDH ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassL:e%»sovv IV_PASSIVE_L ;
 +V+IV+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML IV_PASSIVE_S ;
